Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 5

Beer Wholesaler-Supplier Relations

57-5-501. Purpose.

The legislative intent and purpose of this part is to provide a structure for the business relations between suppliers and wholesalers of beer which:

Motivates suppliers and wholesalers to devote reasonable efforts and resources to the sale, distribution and quality control of beer in this state;

Provides for the private settlement of disputes between suppliers and wholesalers as an alternative to civil litigation, which would consume the time and resources of the parties and the judicial system; and

Promotes public health, safety and welfare.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 1.

Cross-References. Transportation, title 57, ch. 5, part 4.

57-5-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agreement” means any agreement between a wholesaler and a supplier, oral or written, whereby a wholesaler is granted the right to purchase and sell a brand or brands of beer with an alcoholic content of five percent (5%) by weight or less sold by a supplier;

“Ancillary business” means:

A business owned by a wholesaler, by a substantial stockholder of a wholesaler, or by a substantial partner of a wholesaler, the primary business of which is directly related to the transporting, storing or marketing of the supplier's products; or

A business owned by a wholesaler, a substantial stockholder of a wholesaler, or by a substantial partner of a wholesaler, which recycles empty beverage containers;

“Designated member” means:

The spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother or sister of a deceased individual who owned an interest in a wholesaler;

Any person who inherits an ownership interest in a wholesaler;

The appointed and qualified personal representative and the testamentary trustee of a deceased individual owning an interest in a wholesaler; or

The person appointed by a court as the guardian or conservator of the property of an incapacitated individual owning an interest in a wholesaler;

“Good faith” means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing in the trade, as defined in and interpreted under § 47-2-103(1)(b);

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, syndicate, or any other combination of individuals;

“Reasonable standards and qualifications” means those criteria established and consistently applied by a supplier to wholesalers in Tennessee and adjoining states who:

Have entered into, continued or renewed an agreement with the supplier during a period of twenty-four (24) months prior to the proposed transfer of the wholesaler's business; or

Have changed managers or successor managers during a period of twenty-four (24) months prior to the proposed change in manager or successor manager of the wholesaler's business;

“Retaliatory action” includes, but is not limited to, the refusal to continue an agreement or a material reduction in the quality of service or quantity of products available to a wholesaler under an agreement, which refusal or reduction is not made in good faith;

“Substantial stockholder” or “substantial partner” means a stockholder of or partner in the wholesaler who owns an interest of ten percent (10%) or more of the partnership or of the capital stock of a corporate wholesaler;

“Supplier” means a manufacturer or importer of beer;

“Transfer of wholesaler's business” or “transfer of the wholesaler's business” means the voluntary sale, assignment or other transfer of all or control of the business, or all or substantially all of the assets of the wholesaler, or all or control of the capital stock of the wholesaler, including without limitation the sale or other transfer of capital stock or assets by merger, consolidation or dissolution, or of the capital stock of the parent corporation, or of the capital stock or beneficial ownership of any other entity owning or controlling the wholesaler; and

“Wholesaler” means a person or entity that sells beer to retailers, but does not include any manufacturer authorized to sell directly to retailers pursuant to § 57-5-101.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 2; 2014, ch. 861, §§ 18, 19; 2015, ch. 19, § 4.

Cross-References. Definitions for the Sales chapter of the Uniform Commercial Code, §47-2-103.

57-5-503. Prohibitions.

The following are prohibited under this part:

A wholesaler shall not:

Transfer the wholesaler's business without giving the supplier written notice of the proposed transfer of the business as required by this part; or

Transfer the wholesaler's business without receiving the supplier's written approval for the proposed transfer, where required by an agreement and consistent with this part.

A supplier shall not:

Coerce, or attempt to coerce, any wholesaler to do any illegal act or to violate any law or regulation either by threatening to amend, modify, cancel, terminate, or refuse to renew any agreement existing between the supplier and the wholesaler, or by any other means;

Coerce, or attempt to coerce, any wholesaler to accept delivery of any beer or other commodity which has not been ordered by the wholesaler or, if ordered, has been cancelled by the wholesaler in accordance with reasonable cancellation procedures of the supplier. A supplier may impose reasonable inventory requirements upon a wholesaler if the requirements are made in good faith and are generally applied to other wholesalers in Tennessee and adjoining states having an agreement with the supplier;

Withhold delivery of beer ordered by a wholesaler or change a wholesaler's quota of a brand or brands if the withholding or change is not made in good faith;

Require a wholesaler to purchase one (1) or more brands of beer or other products in order for the wholesaler to purchase another brand or brands of beer for any reason. If a wholesaler has agreed to distribute a brand or brands before March 1, 1990, that wholesaler shall continue to distribute the brand or brands in conformance with this part;

Require a wholesaler to assent to any condition, stipulation or provision unreasonably limiting the wholesaler's right to sell a brand or brands of beer or other products of any other supplier;

Require a wholesaler to submit audited financial information, including, but not limited to, profit and loss statements, balance sheets, financial records or specific information regarding competitive brands, as a condition of renewal or continuation of an agreement;

Require a wholesaler by any means to participate directly in or contribute to any local or national advertising fund or purchase any merchandising material controlled either directly or indirectly by the supplier;

Require a wholesaler to terminate the designation of an individual as a manager or successor manager without just cause. A supplier has just cause to require termination of the designation of an individual as a manager or successor manager only if the person designated by the wholesaler fails to meet reasonable standards and qualifications. In any action challenging such termination, the supplier shall have the burden of proving that such person fails to meet such standards and qualifications;

Take any retaliatory action against a wholesaler who files a complaint with any regulatory body or in any court of law regarding an alleged violation by the supplier of federal, state or local law or of any administrative rule; or

Threaten to cancel or withhold credit, or to reduce the time period normally given the wholesaler to make payment on a delivery from the supplier as a means of compelling the wholesaler to meet certain standards of performance in any area of business not directly related to credit.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 3.

57-5-504. Transfer of wholesaler's business.

A wholesaler shall give the supplier written notice of the wholesaler's proposed transfer of the wholesaler's business not less than thirty (30) days prior to the completion of the transfer, except in cases of transfer by inheritance, in which case the transferee shall give the supplier written notice of the transferee's ownership interest within a reasonable time after the transfer is completed.

A supplier's consent shall not be required for any transfer of the wholesaler's business to a designated member or for any transfer of less than control of the wholesaler's business; however, a supplier's written consent shall be required for any transfer of the wholesaler's business to a person other than a designated member.

Notwithstanding subsection (b), written consent from a supplier shall be required for any transfer of the wholesaler's business to a designated member or other transferee if any of the following conditions apply:

The transferee or any owner of the transferee has been convicted of a felony under the United States Code or the laws of any state which would adversely affect the good will or interests of the wholesaler or supplier;

The transferee or any owner of the transferee has had a previous alcoholic beverage license revoked or suspended by the regulatory agency of the United States government or any state, whereby service was interrupted for more than ninety (90) days;

The transferee or any owner of the transferee is insolvent or has filed any voluntary or involuntary petition under any bankruptcy or receivership laws, or has executed an assignment for the benefit of creditors; or

The transferee or any owner of the transferee has had any previous agreement with the supplier involuntarily terminated, cancelled, discontinued or not renewed by the supplier for good cause.

If the transferee is a designated member, a supplier shall not interfere with, prevent or unreasonably delay the transfer of the wholesaler's business. An unreasonable delay is one that exceeds thirty (30) days after the intended date of transfer as set forth in the notice required by subsection (a).

If the transferee is not a designated member, a supplier may not withhold consent or unreasonably interfere with or delay the transfer if the transferee meets reasonable standards and qualifications which are nondiscriminatory and material. An unreasonable delay is one that exceeds thirty (30) days after the receipt of all material information reasonably requested. The supplier shall have the burden of proving that the proposed transferee does not meet such standards and qualifications.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 4.

57-5-505. Termination or modification of agreement with wholesaler by supplier upon written notice — Conditions.

A supplier may amend, modify, terminate, cancel, discontinue or fail to renew an agreement with a wholesaler immediately upon written notice given by the supplier as provided in § 57-5-508 only if any of the following occurs:

Revocation of a governmental permit held by the wholesaler, whereby the wholesaler cannot service the wholesaler's sales territory for a period of more than sixty (60) days;

Insolvency of the wholesaler, the filing of any petition by or against the wholesaler under any bankruptcy or receivership law, or the assignment for the benefit of creditors or dissolution or liquidation of the wholesaler, where such condition materially affects the wholesaler's ability to remain in business;

Fraud by the wholesaler in dealings with the supplier or its products that adversely affects the interests of the supplier;

Violation of § 57-6-104(f), if it was done at the direction or with the knowledge of a substantial stockholder or substantial partner. If a governmental permit held by a wholesaler is suspended temporarily so that the wholesaler cannot service its sales territory for a brand or brands, then upon agreement of the supplier of that brand or brands and the wholesaler whose permit has been suspended, another wholesaler who handles the same brand or brands can service the sales territory during the period of suspension; or

The wholesaler has failed to pay for beer ordered and delivered in accordance with established terms with a supplier and fails to make full payment within five (5) business days after receipt of written notice of the delinquency and demand for immediate payment from the supplier.

Where the wholesaler notifies the supplier in writing by certified mail of the wholesaler's intent to cease distribution of a brand sold by the supplier, the supplier can amend, modify, terminate, cancel, discontinue or fail to renew the agreement immediately with respect to that brand.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 5.

57-5-506. Termination or modification of agreement with wholesaler by supplier in not less than 30 days upon written notice — Conditions.

A supplier may amend, modify, terminate, cancel, discontinue or fail to renew an agreement with a wholesaler not less than thirty (30) days after written notice is given by the supplier as provided in §57-5-508 if any of the following events occur:

The supplier discontinues production or discontinues distribution in this state of a brand sold by the supplier to the wholesaler.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a supplier from conducting test marketing of a new brand of beer or a brand of beer which is not currently being sold in this state; provided, that the supplier has notified the state in writing of its plans to conduct test marketing, which notice shall describe the market area in which the test shall be conducted, the name or names of the wholesaler or wholesalers who will be selling the beer, the name or names of the brand of beer being tested, and the period of time, not to exceed eighteen (18) months, during which the testing will take place.

If a supplier discontinues production or distribution in this state of a brand pursuant to this section, then that supplier cannot reintroduce that brand into this state for a period of twelve (12) months after providing the written notice required by this section.

Whenever a supplier discontinues production or distribution in this state of a brand, the supplier shall be required at the wholesaler's request to purchase from the wholesaler any unsold inventory of the brand; or

A stockholder or a partner of the wholesaler has been convicted of a felony under the United States Code or the laws of any state which would adversely affect the good will or interests of the wholesaler or supplier. If another stockholder or other stockholders, or partner or partners, or a designated member or members notifies the supplier in writing within thirty (30) days after the conviction of an intent to purchase the partnership interest or the stock of the offending stockholder or partner and purchases the interest or stock within a reasonable time after notice is given, then this subdivision (2) shall not apply. Any purchase of an interest or stock pursuant to this subdivision (2) will be subject to the requirements of supplier consent contained in § 57-5-504.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 6.

57-5-507. Termination or modification of agreement with wholesaler by supplier — Prerequisites.

Except as provided in §§57-5-505 and57-5-506, a supplier may not amend, modify, terminate, cancel, discontinue or refuse to renew an agreement with a wholesaler, or cause a wholesaler to resign from an agreement, unless the supplier has complied with the following requirements:

The supplier shall give written notice to the wholesaler, as provided in § 57-5-508, not less than ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, discontinuance or nonrenewal;

The supplier acts in good faith. The supplier shall have the burden of proving that it acted in good faith;

The supplier has good cause. In any action challenging the supplier's action under this section, the supplier shall have the burden of proving that it has good cause. Good cause exists when all of the following have occurred:

The wholesaler has failed to comply substantially with essential and reasonable requirements imposed upon the wholesaler by the agreement, if such requirements are not discriminatory, either by their terms or in the methods of their enforcement, as compared with requirements imposed on other wholesalers in Tennessee or adjoining states and if such requirements are not in violation of any law or regulation;

The supplier first acquired knowledge of the failure described in subdivision (3)(A) not more than twenty-four (24) months before the date notification was given pursuant to this section;

The supplier has given written notice to the wholesaler, stating specifically the manner in which the wholesaler has failed to comply with the agreement; and

The wholesaler was given adequate opportunity to use good faith efforts to correct the failure to comply with the agreement. Adequate opportunity shall be thirty (30) days to submit a plan of corrective action to comply with the agreement and an additional ninety (90) days after the thirty-day period to correct the failure in accordance with the plan.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 7.

57-5-508. Termination or modification of agreement with wholesaler by supplier — Notice.

Notice by a supplier of any amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, discontinuance or refusal to renew an agreement with the wholesaler shall be written, shall be made by certified mail, and shall contain all of the following:

A statement of intention to amend, modify, terminate, cancel, discontinue or refuse to renew the agreement;

A statement of the reason(s) for the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, discontinuance or nonrenewal; and

The date on which the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, discontinuance or nonrenewal will take effect.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 8.

57-5-509. Disputes — Arbitration.

Any dispute arising under this part may be settled by arbitration if every party involved in the dispute agrees to arbitrate. Arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association and the laws of this state, and judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrator(s) may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. A wholesaler has the absolute right to refuse to arbitrate any dispute arising under this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 9.

57-5-510. Legal remedies.

If a supplier engages in conduct prohibited under this part, a wholesaler with which the supplier has an agreement may maintain a civil action against the supplier to recover actual damages, all court costs, and, in the court's discretion, attorney's fees, reasonably incurred as the result of the prohibited conduct. If a wholesaler engages in conduct prohibited under this part, a supplier with which the wholesaler has an agreement may maintain a civil action against the wholesaler to recover actual damages, all court costs, and, in the court's discretion, attorney's fees, reasonably incurred as a result of the prohibited conduct. Actual damages shall include damages to any ancillary business of the wholesaler incurred as a result of the prohibited conduct.

A supplier or wholesaler may bring an action for declaratory judgment for determination of any controversy arising pursuant to this part.

Upon proper application to the court, a supplier or wholesaler may obtain injunctive relief against any violation of this part.

The remedies provided by this section shall not abolish any other cause of action or remedy available to the supplier or the wholesaler.

Any legal action taken under this part, or pursuant to a dispute arising out of an agreement or breach thereof, or over the provisions of an agreement, shall be filed in a court, state or federal, located in Tennessee, which state court is located in, or which federal court has jurisdiction and venue of, the county in which the wholesaler maintains its principal place of business in this state.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 10.

57-5-511. Waiver of rights by wholesaler prohibited — Voluntary settlement of disputes.

A wholesaler may not waive any of the rights granted in any provision of this part and the provisions of any agreement which would have such an effect shall be null and void; however, if a good faith dispute arises between the parties as to the meaning of any rights or obligations created by this part, or the performance by a party of its obligations, the parties may enter into a written voluntary settlement of the dispute.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 11.

57-5-512. Applicability.

This part applies to agreements in existence on March 1, 1990, as well as agreements entered into or renewed after that date.

A transferee of a wholesaler's business that continues to operate the business shall have the benefit of and be bound by all terms and conditions of the agreement with the supplier in effect on the date of the transfer.

If a particular brand or brands of beer are transferred by purchase or otherwise from one supplier to another, the new supplier shall be bound by all terms and conditions of each agreement of the previous supplier with respect to that brand or brands in effect on the date of the transfer as a condition of continuing to sell that brand or brands in this state.

An agreement to purchase and sell a brand of beer shall include the right to purchase and sell each other beer marketed under the same principal brand name or trademark, regardless of any variation in any other words, names, symbols or devices used to identify such beers and regardless of any differences in the packaging, formulation or production of such beers. Notwithstanding the foregoing, an agreement to purchase and sell a brand of beer shall not include the right to purchase and sell any other beer solely as a result of the use of the manufacturer's or importer's trade name in both such beers' packaging, so long as such trade name is not part of the beers' principal brand name or trademark.

This part shall only be applicable to agreements between wholesalers and suppliers related to the sale or distribution of beer with an alcoholic content of five percent (5%) by weight or less. All agreements between wholesalers and suppliers related to the sale or distribution of beer with an alcoholic content greater than five percent (5%) by weight shall be governed by title 47, chapter 25, part 15.

Acts 1990, ch. 618, § 12; 1994, ch. 663, § 1; 1996, ch. 748, § 1; 2014, ch. 861, § 23.